Utah statutes.
67-19-14.5.   Organ donor leave.

(1)  An employee who serves as a bone marrow donor shall be granted a paid leave of absence of up to seven days that are necessary for the donation and recovery from the donation.

(2)  An employee who serves as a donor of a human organ shall be granted a paid leave of absence of up to 30 days that are necessary for the donation and recovery from the donation.



Enacted by Chapter 310, 2002 General Session

